Utah statutes.
8-3-3.   Transcripts to be filed for record.

On the first days of January and July of each year such executive officers and individual owners offering burial lots for sale shall file with the county recorder of the county within which the cemeteries are situated a transcript, duly certified by them, of any and all deeds, certificates of sale or evidences of burial rights issued by them during the preceding six months. The county recorders shall file such abstracts without charge and make any and all necessary notations upon the plats of the cemeteries theretofore filed with them.

